Louisiana, session 2026, HB803.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:1(A)(1) and (3) and (B)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§1. Continuation; qualifications; appointments; terms; vacancies
A. Membership; qualifications; vacancies.
(1) The Board of Commissioners of the Port of New Orleans, hereinafter
referred to as "the board" is continued. The number of members comprising the
board shall be seven eight, who shall be qualified voters, four of whom shall each
have his principal place of business in the parish of Orleans, two of whom shall each
have his principal place of business in the parish of Jefferson, and one two of whom
shall have his principal place of business in the parish of St. Bernard. The four
members from the parish of Orleans shall fill the positions on the board to be
designated as Positions D, E, F, and G; the two members from the parish of Jefferson
shall fill the positions on the board to be designated as Positions A and C; and the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-167 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 803
member two members from the parish of St. Bernard shall fill the position on the
board to be designated as Position B.
* * *
(3) All members shall be experienced in the commerce or industry, or both,
of the port area, and shall otherwise possess the qualifications prescribed by law.
Notwithstanding any prohibition contained in Part II of Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, a member appointed prior to August 1, 2018 on
or after August 1, 2026, employed in the maritime industry may serve as a member
as provided in this Paragraph. The provisions of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950 in effect on the date of the appointment of a member appointed prior
to August 1, 2018 August 1, 2026, shall apply to that member for the term of that
member. The present members appointed prior to August 1, 2018 August 1, 2026,
seven in number, shall continue to serve on the board for the duration of their
respective terms, and shall remain subject to the provisions of Title 42 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 in effect on the date of that member's
appointment. A member appointed on or after August 1, 2018 August 1, 2026,
employed in the maritime industry may serve as a member as provided in this
Paragraph, subject to the provisions of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
* * *
B. Nominating agencies.
* * *
(3) For the purpose of selecting nominees for the member two members to
be appointed by the governor from the nominees selected by the St. Bernard Parish
nominating organization, the following agencies shall constitute and shall be
designated as the St. Bernard Parish nominating organization:
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-167 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 803